New Jersey, session 222, A720.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 35 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-47) is amended to read as follows: 35.  a.  Minor subdivision. An ordinance requiring approval of subdivisions by the planning board may authorize the planning board to waive notice and public hearing for an application for development if the planning board or subdivision committee of the board appointed by the chairman find that the application for development conforms to the definition of "minor subdivision" in section 3.2 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-5).  Minor subdivision approval shall be deemed to be final approval of the subdivision by the board; provided that the board or said subcommittee may condition such approval on terms ensuring the provision of improvements pursuant to sections 29, 29.1, 29.2, and 41 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-38, C.40:55D-39, C.40:55D-40, and C.40:55D-53). b.    Minor subdivision approval shall be granted or denied within 45 days of the date of submission of a complete application to the administrative officer, or within such further time as may be consented to by the applicant.  Failure of the planning board to act within the period prescribed shall constitute minor subdivision approval and a certificate of the administrative officer as to the failure of the planning board to act shall be issued on request of the applicant; and it shall be sufficient in lieu of the written endorsement or other evidence of approval, herein required, and shall be so accepted by the county recording officer for purposes of filing subdivision plats. c.     Whenever review or approval of the application by the county planning board is required by section 5 of P.L.1968, c.285 (C.40:27-6.3), the municipal planning board shall condition any approval that it grants upon timely receipt of a favorable report on the application by the county planning board or approval by the county planning board by its failure to report thereon within the required time period. d.    Except as provided in subsection f. of this section, approval of a minor subdivision shall expire [190] 280 days from the date on which the resolution of municipal approval is adopted unless within such period a plat in conformity with such approval and the provisions of [the "Map Filing Law," P.L.1960, c.141 (C.46:23-9.9 et seq.)] P.L.2011, c.217 (N.J.S.46:26A-1 et al.), or a deed clearly describing the approved minor subdivision is filed by the developer with the county recording officer, the municipal engineer, and the municipal tax assessor.  Any such plat or deed accepted for such filing shall have been signed by the chairman and secretary of the planning board.  In reviewing the application for development for a proposed minor subdivision the planning board may be permitted by ordinance to accept a plat not in conformity with the [the "Map Filing Law," P.L.1960, c.141 (C.46:23-9.9 et seq.)] P.L.2011, c.217 (N.J.S.46:26A-1 et al.); provided that if the developer chooses to file the minor subdivision as provided herein by plat rather than deed such plat shall conform with the provisions of said act. e.     The zoning requirements and general terms and conditions, whether conditional or otherwise, upon which minor subdivision approval was granted, shall not be changed for a period of two years after the date on which the resolution of minor subdivision approval is adopted; provided that the approved minor subdivision shall have been duly recorded as provided in this section. f.     The planning board may extend the [190-day] 280-day period for filing a minor subdivision plat or deed pursuant to subsection d. of this section if the developer proves to the reasonable satisfaction of the planning board: (1) that the developer was barred or prevented, directly or indirectly, from filing because of delays in obtaining legally required approvals from other governmental or quasi-governmental entities; and (2) that the developer applied promptly for and diligently pursued the required approvals. The length of the extension shall be equal to the period of delay caused by the wait for the required approvals, as determined by the planning board.  The developer may apply for the extension either before or after what would otherwise be the expiration date. g.    The planning board shall grant an extension of minor subdivision approval for a period determined by the board but not exceeding one year from what would otherwise be the expiration date, if the developer proves to the reasonable satisfaction of the board that the developer was barred or prevented, directly or indirectly, from proceeding with the development because of delays in obtaining legally required approvals from other governmental entities and that the developer applied promptly for and diligently pursued the required approvals.  A developer shall apply for the extension before: (1) what would otherwise be the expiration date of minor subdivision approval; or (2) the 91st day after the developer receives the last legally required approval from other governmental entities, whichever occurs later. (cf: P.L.1991, c.256, s.9) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.